nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsapparater > Gulv- og damprensere > Teppevaskere: Tepperensere med beholder; Teppeuttrekkere; Tørrtepperensere; Tepperensere med dobbeltank; Bærbare tepperensere; Damprensere for tepper; Vertikale tepperensere
th: บ้านและสวน > เครื่องใช้ภายในบ้าน > เครื่องทำความสะอาดพื้นแบบไอน้ำ > ผลิตภัณฑ์ทำความสะอาดพรม: เครื่องทำความสะอาดพรมทรงถัง; เครื่องทำความสะอาดพรมแบบละเอียด; เครื่องทำความสะอาดพรมแบบแห้ง; เครื่องทำความสะอาดพรมแบบถังคู่; เครื่องทำความสะอาดพรมแบบพกพา; เครื่องทำความสะอาดพรมแบบไอน้ำ; เครื่องทำความสะอาดพรมแบบตั้งตรง
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliances > Floor & Steam Cleaners > Carpet Shampooers: Canister Carpet Shampooers; Carpet Extractors; Dry Carpet Shampooers; Dual Tank Carpet Shampooers; Portable Carpet Shampooers; Steam Carpet Shampooers; Upright Carpet Shampooers
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器 > 蒸氣清潔機 > 地毯清洗劑: 圓筒式地毯清洗機; 地毯抽吸機; 乾式地毯清洗劑; 雙筒式地毯清洗機; 攜帶型地毯清洗劑; 蒸氣地毯清洗劑; 直立式地毯清洗劑
it: Casa e giardino > Dispositivi elettrodomestici > Pulitrici a vapore e lavapavimenti > Pulitori per tappeti: Pulitori in bombola per tappeti; Estrattori per tappeti; Detergenti a secco per tappeti; Detergenti per tappeti a doppio serbatoio; Detergenti per tappeti portatili; Detergenti a vapore per tappeti; Detergenti per uso verticale per tappeti
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater > Gulv- og damprensere > Tæpperens: Tæpperensbeholdere; Tæppeudtrækkere; Tør tæpperens; Tæpperens med dobbelt tank; Transportabel tæpperens; Damptæpperens; Opretstående tæpperens
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsapparater > Maskiner för ångrengöring av mattor > Mattschampoo: Burkmattschamponerare; Mattutdragare; Torrmattschamponerare; Dubbeltankmattschamponerare; Bärbar mattschamponerare; Ångmattschamponerare; Upprätt mattschamponerare
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte > Teppich- & Dampfreinigungsgeräte > Teppich-Shampooniermaschinen: Kanister-Teppich-Shampooniermaschinen; Teppichextraktoren; Shampooniermaschinen für trockene Teppiche; Teppich-Shampooniermaschinen mit zwei Tanks; Tragbare Teppich-Shampooniermaschinen; Damp-Teppich-Shampooniermaschinen; Aufrechte Teppich-Shampooniermaschinen
ru: Дом и сад > Бытовая техника > Техника для влажной уборки полов и ковров > Моющие пылесосы для ковров: Классические моющие пылесосы для ковров; Ковромоечные машины; Моющие пылесосы для ковров с функцией сухой уборки; Моющие пылесосы для ковров с двумя баками; Портативные моющие пылесосы для ковров; Паровые моющие пылесосы для ковров; Вертикальные моющие пылесосы для ковров
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家用电器 > 电动蒸汽拖把 > 地毯清洗机: 罐式地毯清洗机; 地毯抽吸机; 干地毯清洗机; 双箱地毯清洗机; 便携式地毯清洗机; 蒸汽地毯清洗机; 立式地毯清洗机
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče > Čističe podlah a parní čističe > Čističe koberců: Podlahové tepovače koberců; Extraktory na koberce; Tepovače koberců pro čištění za sucha; Tepovače koberců s dvojitou nádržkou; Přenosné tepovače koberců; Parní tepovače koberců; Vertikální/tyčové tepovače koberců
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Домакински уреди > Уреди за почистване на подове и парочистачки > Прахосмукачки за пране на килими: Професионални прахосмукачки с метален контейнер за пране на килими; Екстрактори за почистване на килими; Прахосмукачки за сухо пране на килими; Прахосмукачки за пране на килими с двоен резервоар; Преносими прахосмукачки за пране на килими; Прахосмукачки за пране на килими с пара; Прави прахосмукачки за пране на килими
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneet > Lattia- ja höyrypesurit > Mattopesurit: Mattopesurit säiliöllä; Matonpoistolaitteet; Kuivapesurit matoille; Mattopesurit kahdella säiliöllä; Kannettavat mattopesurit; Höyrymattopesurit; Pystyasentoiset mattopesurit
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Electrocasnice > Dispozitive de curățat podeaua și dispozitive de curățare cu abur > Dispozitive pentru spălat covoare: Dispozitive cu rezervor pentru spălat covoare; Dispozitive de curățat covoare cu extracție; Dispozitive pentru curățare chimică covoare; Dispozitive pentru curățat covoare cu rezervor dublu; Dispozitive portabile pentru spălat covoare; Dispozitive pentru spălat covoare cu abur; Dispozitive verticale pentru spălat covoare
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Domáce spotrebiče > Parné čističe na podlahy > Tepovače kobercov: Tepovače kobercov s nádržkou; Vysávače kobercov; Vysávače na suché tepovanie; Tepovače kobercov s dvomi nádržkami; Prenosné tepovače kobercov; Parné tepovače kobercov; Tyčové tepovače kobercov
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kućanski aparati > Čistači i parni čistači za podove > Strojevi za pranje tepiha: Strojevi za pranje tepiha sa spremnikom; Ekstraktori za tepihe; Suhi šamponi za tepihe; Strojevi za pranje tepiha s dva spremnika; Prijenosni strojevi za pranje tepiha; Strojevi za parno čišćenje tepiha; Uspravni strojevi za pranje tepiha
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aletleri > Zemin Temizleyiciler ve Buharlı Temizleyiciler > Halı Şampuanları: Bidon Halı Şampuanı Uygulayıcılar; Halı Sıkma Makineleri; Kuru Halı Şampuanı Uygulayıcılar; Çift Tanklı Halı Şampuanı Uygulayıcılar; Portatif Halı Şampuanı Uygulayıcılar; Buharlı Halı Şampuanı Uygulayıcılar; Dik Halı Şampuanı Uygulayıcılar
pl: Dom i ogród > Sprzęt AGD > Myjki parowe do dywanów > Szampony do dywanów: Odkurzacze piorące ze zbiornikiem; Ekstraktory do dywanów; Odkurzacze piorące na sucho; Odkurzacze piorące z dwoma zbiornikami; Odkurzacze piorące przenośne; Odkurzacze piorące parowe; Odkurzacze piorące stojące
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Οικιακές συσκευές > Καθαριστές δαπέδου & ατμού > Καθαριστές χαλιών με σαμπουάν: Καθαριστές χαλιών με δοχείο σαμπουάν; Μηχανές καθαρισμού ταπήτων με χρήση διαλυτών; Καθαριστές χαλιών στεγνού σαμπουάν; Καθαριστές χαλιών με διπλή δεξαμενή; Φορητοί καθαριστές χαλιών; Καθαριστές χαλιών ατμού με σαμπουάν; Όρθιοι καθαριστές χαλιών με σαμπουάν
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski aparati > Čistilci za tla in parni čistilci > Mokri sesalniki za preproge: Mokri sesalniki za preproge s posodo; Globinski čistilniki za preproge; Suhi sesalniki za preproge; Mokri sesalniki za preproge z dvojnim rezervoarjem; Prenosni mokri sesalniki za preproge; Parni mokri sesalniki za preproge; Pokončni mokri sesalniki za preproge
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Eletrodomésticos > Limpadores de carpete a vapor > Limpadores de carpetes: Limpadores de carpetes com recipiente; Extratores de carpete; Limpadores de carpetes a seco; Limpadores de carpetes com tanque duplo; Limpadores de carpetes portáteis; Limpadores de carpetes a vapor; Limpadores de carpetes verticais
fr: Maison et jardin > Appareils électroménagers > Nettoyeurs de sols et vapeur > Shampouineuse pour tapis: Shampouineuses pour tapis à cartouche; Extracteurs de tapis; Shampouineuses sèches pour tapis; Shampouineuses pour tapis à double réservoir; Shampouineuses portables pour tapis; Shampouineuses à vapeur pour tapis; Shampouineuses verticales pour tapis
vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị gia dụng > Thiết bị làm sạch bằng hơi nước > Máy giặt thảm tạo bọt: Máy giặt thảm Canister; Máy vắt thảm; Máy giặt khô thảm; Máy giặt thảm có bồn kép; Máy giặt thảm di động; Máy giặt thảm hơi nước; Máy giặt thảm thẳng đứng
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電 > カーペット用スチームクリーナー > カーペット用シャンプー: キャニスターカーペット用シャンプー; カーペットエクストラクター; カーペット用ドライシャンプー; 2槽式カーペットシャンプー; ポータブルカーペット用シャンプー; スチームカーペット用シャンプー; 直立型カーペット用シャンプー
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási gépek > Padló- és gőztisztítók > Szőnyegsamponok: Kanniszteres szőnyegsamponok; Szőnyegszívók; Száraz szőnyegsamponok; Dupla tartályos szőnyegsamponok; Hordozható szőnyegsamponok; Gőzös szőnyegsamponok; Álló szőnyegsamponok
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Eletrodomésticos > Dispositivos de limpeza a vapor e de chão > Dispositivos de aplicação de champô em carpetes: Dispositivos de aplicação de champô em carpetes com depósito; Extratores de carpete; Dispositivos de aplicação de champô em carpetes a seco; Dispositivos de aplicação de champô em carpetes com dois reservatórios; Dispositivos de aplicação de champô em carpetes portáteis; Dispositivos de aplicação de champô em carpetes a vapor; Dispositivos de aplicação de champô em carpetes verticais
es: Casa y jardín > Electrodomésticos > Limpiadores de vapor de alfombras y suelos > Lavadoras de alfombras: Limpiadores para alfombras en bote; Extractores de alfombras; Limpiadores de alfombras en seco; Limpiadores de alfombras de doble depósito; Limpiadores de alfombras portátiles; Limpiadores de alfombras a vapor; Limpiadores de alfombras verticales
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke apparaten > Tapijtstomers > Tapijtreiniger: Canister-tapijtreiniger; Tapijttrekkers; Droge tapijtreiniger; Tapijtreiniger met dubbele tank; Draagbare tapijtreiniger; Stoomtapijtreiniger; Staande tapijtreiniger
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinė technika > Grindų ir gariniai valymo įrenginiai > Kilimų plovimo su šampūnu prietaisai: Kanistriniai kilimų plovimo su šampūnu prietaisai; Kilimų siurbliai; Sausojo kilimų plovimo su šampūnu prietaisai; Dviejų rezervuarų kilimų plovimo su šampūnu prietaisai; Nešiojamieji kilimų plovimo su šampūnu prietaisai; Gariniai kilimų plovimo su šampūnu prietaisai; Vertikalūs kilimų plovimo su šampūnu prietaisai
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품 > 바닥/스팀 청소기 > 카펫 샴푸어: 캐니스터 카펫 샴푸어; 카펫 익스트렉터; 건식 카펫 샴푸어; 이중 탱크 카펫 샴푸어; 휴대용 카펫 샴푸어; 증기식 카펫 샴푸어; 직립형 카펫 샴푸어